Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 3
FOSTER YOUTH IN TRANSITION PROGRAM

19-7-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Each year, for a variety of reasons, more than two hundred youth, ages eighteen to twenty-one, exit Colorado's foster care system without an established permanent home or a stable support network;

These youth typically do not have the same safety nets, supportive adults, and support networks as other youth their age;

Many of these youth will face challenges as they search for affordable housing, pursue higher education or training, search for employment, manage tight budgets, take care of health needs, and more;

Youth who are making the transition out of foster care into independent living face not only the typical developmental changes and new experiences that are common to youth but also the dramatic change from being under the county's care to being on their
own, many without any support systems to help them succeed;

Additionally, many of these youth are dealing with the long-term consequences of trauma related to their experience with abuse, neglect, removal, or overall lack of resources;

The array of services and supports available to youth while they are in the foster care system, including housing, food, health care, and caseworker support, diminish when the youth exit the foster care system; and

Available research shows that emancipating youth benefit from extended foster care services and supports until age twenty-one, and community-based supports through early adulthood, but for the benefits of such services and supports to last, youth in foster
care need developmentally appropriate services, including freedom to test their independence and to make mistakes with proportional consequences and a reasonable safety net.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that by establishing a voluntary transitional foster care program, allowing youth to reenter the state's foster care system through a foster youth in transition program, and ensuring equitable access to less restrictive
supports in the community, the state can better meet the needs of those youth who are making the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2200, § 1, effective June 25.

19-7-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advisory board" means the foster youth successful transition to adulthood grant program advisory board created in section 19-7-314.

"County department" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103.

"Emancipation transition plan" means a plan developed pursuant to section 19-7-310 that addresses how the youth will meet the youth's needs upon the youth's imminent emancipation from foster care.

"Evidence-based service" means a service that is eligible for reimbursement pursuant to the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 672, and that is trauma-informed, promising, supported, or well-supported.

"Executive director" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103.

"Foster care" has the same meaning set forth in section 19-1-103 (66).

"Grant program" means the foster youth successful transition to adulthood grant program created in section 19-7-314.

"Participating youth" means a youth who voluntarily agrees to participate in the transition program and meets the eligibility requirements set forth in section 19-7-304.

"Reasonable efforts" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103 (114).

"Roadmap to success" means a written description of a youth's goals, programs, and services provided during an open case that will assist youth who are fourteen years of age or older and in foster care to the youth's eventual transition from foster care
to successful adulthood. The document is developed collaboratively with the youth.

"Service provider" means an agency that applies for funding to provide services through the grant program.

"State department" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103.

"Supervised independent living placement" means a setting in which a youth is living independently with county department supervision. "Supervised independent living placement" is designed to promote and lead to a youth's successful emancipation.

"Transition program" or "foster youth in transition program" means the program established pursuant to section 19-7-303 in which an eligible youth may voluntarily opt to continue or resume receiving child welfare services that may include but are not
limited to foster care maintenance payments.

"Voluntary services agreement" means a standardized voluntary services agreement entered into by a participating youth pursuant to section 19-7-306.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2201, § 1, effective June 25.

19-7-303. Foster youth in transition program - established.

The foster youth in transition program is established in the state department to be implemented in county departments throughout the state to provide extended child welfare services to eligible youth eighteen years of age or older but less than twenty-one
years of age, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law. Each county department shall make the transition program available to eligible youth on a voluntary basis. The child welfare services provided
through the transition program must be client-directed and developmentally appropriate, as set forth in a voluntary services agreement developed and entered into pursuant to section 19-7-306 and, when required, overseen by the juvenile
court in a youth in transition proceeding brought pursuant to this part 3. The state department is encouraged to submit, as part of the annual budget process, a request for increased appropriations to fund the increased caseload for
the transition program.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2202, § 1, effective June 25.

19-7-304. Eligibility and enrollment.

An eligible youth is an individual who:

Is at least eighteen years of age or older, but less than twenty-one years of age, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law;

Has a current dependency and neglect case or has current or recent prior foster care or kinship care involvement in at least one of the following ways:

The youth was in foster care, as defined in section 19-1-103, on or after the youth's sixteenth birthday;

The youth was in noncertified kinship care, as defined in section 19-1-103, on or after the youth's sixteenth birthday and was adjudicated dependent and neglected pursuant to article 3 of this title 19; or

The youth turned eighteen years of age when the youth was a named child or youth in a dependency and neglect case open through article 3 of this title 19;

Except as provided in subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section, or except as such requirements may be waived by federal law, is engaged in, or intends to engage in, at least one of the following:

Completing secondary education or an educational program leading to an equivalent credential;

Attending an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education;

Working part- or full-time for at least eighty hours per month; or

Participating in a program or activity designed to promote employment or remove barriers to employment.

The requirement described in subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section does not apply to a youth who is incapable of engaging in any of the activities described in subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section as a result of a medical condition that is supported by
regularly updated documentation in the youth's case plan; and

Seeks to enter into or has entered into and is substantially fulfilling the youth's obligations pursuant to a voluntary services agreement with the appropriate county department.

An individual who is no longer under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and believes he or she may be an eligible youth may request to participate in the transition program by making a request to the county department where the youth self-attests
that the youth resides. The youth shall provide documentation of the youth's legal name and date of birth, if available. If the youth does not have such documentation, the youth may attest to the youth's legal name and date of
birth. The youth shall provide current contact information.

The county department shall determine whether a youth is eligible within three business days of the youth's request and, if so, explain the transition program and provide the voluntary services agreement to the eligible youth. Within three business days
of an eligible youth's decision to enter the program, the county department shall prepare and execute, in collaboration with the eligible youth, a voluntary services agreement, as described in section 19-7-306; provide a copy of
the voluntary services agreement to the eligible youth; and, within ninety days of a voluntary services agreement remaining in effect, file a petition with the juvenile court pursuant to section 19-7-307 that includes the voluntary
services agreement. If the county department determines that the youth is not eligible, the county department shall notify the youth of the county department's determination, the reasons for such determination, how to appeal a
denial of eligibility, and provide contact information for the office of the child's representative.

An eligible youth may voluntarily participate in the transition program for any length of time until the last day of the month of the individual's twenty-first birthday, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law.

A participating youth retains all the rights and responsibilities the individual would normally have, including but not limited to consenting to the youth's own medical care; entering into contracts, including but not limited to leasing contracts, employment
contracts, and contracts for purchase; and obtaining and maintaining accounts with financial institutions.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2203, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(1)(b) amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 419, § 6, effective August 10.

19-7-305. Available services and supports.

Each county department shall offer, at a minimum, the following services and supports to participating youth in the transition program:

Assistance with enrolling in the appropriate category of medicaid for which the participating youth is eligible;

Assistance with securing safe, affordable, and stable housing in the following ways:

The participating youth's living expenses are fully or partially funded through foster care maintenance payments, in addition to any other housing assistance the youth is eligible to receive. Any expectations for the youth to contribute to the youth's
own expenses must be based upon the youth's ability to pay.

With the participating youth's consent, the participating youth's housing may be in any placement approved by the county department or the court for which the participating youth is otherwise eligible, including a licensed host family home, as defined
in section 26-5.7-102 (3.5), or a supervised independent living placement, and that is the least restrictive option to meet the participating youth's needs; or

If the participating youth needs placement in a qualified residential treatment program, then such placement must follow all relevant procedures pursuant to section 19-1-115 concerning the placement of a child or youth in a qualified residential treatment
program.

Case management services, including the development of a case plan with a roadmap to success for the participating youth, as well as assistance in the following areas, as appropriate, and with the agreement of the participating youth:

Provision of resources to assist the participating youth in the transition to adulthood;

Obtaining employment or other financial support and enhancing financial literacy;

Obtaining a driver's license or other government-issued identification card;

Obtaining appropriate community resources and public benefits;

Upon request, and if services are available, referral to services satisfying any juvenile or criminal justice system requirements and assisting with expunging the participating youth's court records, as appropriate, pursuant to section 19-1-306;

Pursuing educational goals and applying for financial aid, if necessary;

Upon request, and if services are available, referral to services for obtaining the necessary state court findings and applying for special immigrant juvenile status pursuant to federal law, as applicable, or applying for other immigration relief for
which the participating youth may be qualified;

Obtaining copies of health and education records;

Maintaining and building relationships with individuals who are important to the participating youth, including searching for individuals with whom the participating youth has lost contact; and

Accessing information about maternal and paternal relatives, including any siblings.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2204, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(1)(b) amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 419, § 7, effective August 10.

19-7-306. Voluntary services agreement.

A voluntary services agreement entered into pursuant to this part 3 is a binding standardized agreement, written in a client-driven and developmentally appropriate manner, between the county department and a participating youth. The agreement specifies
the terms of the youth's participation in the transition program, including, at a minimum:

The participating youth's retention of all rights and responsibilities the youth would otherwise have, as described in section 19-7-304 (5);

Establishing the legal authority for placement with the county department;

The participating youth's rights and obligations while the agreement is in effect, including the right to counsel. Upon entering into a voluntary services agreement with an eligible youth, the county department shall make a referral in writing to the
office of the child's representative and provide the youth with the contact information for the office of the child's representative. Nothing in this section limits the power of the court to appoint counsel or the power
of the office of the child's representative to assign counsel prior to the filing of a petition.

A statement concerning the voluntary nature of the transition program and the participating youth's right to terminate the agreement at any time and the procedures for such termination and the right to begin receiving services again, if needed, up to
the youth's twenty-first birthday, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law;

The county department's rights and obligations while the agreement is in effect;

The services that will be available to the participating youth through the transition program, as specified in the roadmap to success; and

The circumstances under which a county department may request that the court terminate the agreement and the court's jurisdiction over the objection of the participating youth.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2206, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(1)(a) amended and (1)(a.5) added, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 420, § 8, effective August 10.

19-7-307. Petition - form and content.

A youth or a participating youth may file a petition on the youth's own behalf at any time. Or, if such a petition has not yet been filed and a voluntary services agreement remains in effect after ninety days, a county department shall file a petition
with the court initiating a proceeding pursuant to this part 3 titled "The people of the state of Colorado, in the matter of _____, a youth in transition". The petition must be verified and the statements may be made upon information
and belief.

(1.5) For a youth who is entering the foster youth in transition program directly from a case through this title 19, at the youth's option, the petition must be filed in either the county where the youth self-attests to reside or a county that is currently
serving the eligible youth. For a youth who does not have a current case pursuant to this title 19, the petition must be filed in the county where the youth self-attests to reside.

The petition must plainly set forth the facts that bring the participating youth under the court's jurisdiction. The petition must also state the participating youth's name, age, and why venue in this court is proper pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this
section. The petition must state that the youth is voluntarily entering foster care and one of the following, whichever is applicable:

The youth was removed from home prior to the youth reaching eighteen years of age pursuant to a judicial determination that it was contrary to the youth's welfare to remain in the home, that reasonable efforts were made to keep the youth in the home,
and that because the youth has remained in foster care continuously, a new court-ordered removal is not required; or

Reasonable efforts to prevent removal were not required because a youth who is eighteen years of age or older may enter into the voluntary services agreement on the youth's own behalf.

Repealed.

Each petition filed for a foster youth in transition pursuant to this part 3 must include the following statements:

That the participating youth retains all the adult rights and responsibilities that the participating youth would otherwise have, as described in section 19-7-304 (5); and

That by consenting to the facts set forth in the petition and the jurisdiction of the court, the participating youth may be required to attend court at least once every six months pursuant to section 19-3-702. The participating youth may request that
the case be dismissed at any time, forgoing the benefits and obligations of the transition program.

In addition to providing notice to the participating youth, the court shall ensure that notice of all hearings and reviews held regarding the participating youth is provided to licensed foster parents with whom a participating youth is placed, not including
adults with whom a participating youth lives through a supervised independent living placement. Licensed foster parents have the right to be heard at such hearings and reviews but must not be made a party to the action solely on
the basis of notice and the right to be heard.

The petition must be accompanied by a copy of the voluntary services agreement executed pursuant to section 19-7-306; except that when the youth files the petition on the youth's own behalf, the voluntary services agreement need only be executed by the
youth and does not require a signature by the county department at the time the petition is filed. For a participating youth entering the transition program directly from an open case pursuant to article 3 of this title 19, the
petition must also include a current copy of the participating youth's roadmap to success.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2206, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(1.5) added, (2) and (6) amended, and (3) repealed, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 420, § 9, effective August 10.

19-7-308. Right to counsel - guardian ad litem - representation of petitioner.

A participating youth has a right to counsel. If the youth accepts the publicly provided counsel, counsel must be assigned by the office of the child's representative or approved by the court from a list of attorneys appointed by the office of the child's
representative. The office of the child's representative shall develop practice standards and guidelines for representing participating youth in proceedings brought pursuant to this part 3.

When a court determines a guardian ad litem is necessary for a participating youth due to the youth's diminished capacity, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem from the list of attorneys approved by the office of the child's representative. The
court shall not deem a guardian ad litem to be a substitute for counsel for youth.

In all proceedings brought pursuant to this part 3, the county department must be represented by a county attorney, a special county attorney, or an attorney of a city or city and county.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2207, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(2) amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 421, § 10, effective August 10.

19-7-309. Supervised independent living placements - background checks not required.

A county department is not required to conduct background checks for other residents of a supervised independent living placement as a condition of approving a participating youth's independent living setting.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2208, § 1, effective June 25.

19-7-309.5. Initial hearings.

The court shall set the matter for an initial hearing within fifty-six days of receipt of a petition filed pursuant to this section, and the court shall appoint counsel for youth for the petitioning youth. If the office of the child's representative has
already assigned counsel, the court shall appoint the same attorney.

At the initial hearing, the court shall advise the youth that:

Services provided through the transition program are voluntary for the youth, and the youth may remain in the transition program until the last day of the month in which the youth turns twenty-one years of age, or such greater age of foster care eligibility
as required by federal law, so long as the youth meets all other program eligibility requirements pursuant to section 19-7-304;

If the youth chooses to leave the transition program but later decides support is needed, the youth has the right to begin receiving child welfare services again through the transition program; and

The youth has the right to counsel.

At the initial hearing, the court shall determine:

Whether the youth has voluntarily entered foster care and that the county department has legal authority for placement;

Whether it is in the best interest of the youth to be voluntarily placed in foster care; and

If one of the following applies:

The youth was removed from home prior to the youth reaching eighteen years of age pursuant to a judicial determination that it was contrary to the youth's welfare to remain in the home, that reasonable efforts were made to keep the youth in the home,
and that because the youth has remained in foster care continuously, a new court-ordered removal is not required; or

Reasonable efforts to prevent removal were not required because a youth who is eighteen years of age or older may enter into the voluntary services agreement on the youth's own behalf.

If the court determines that the requirements of subsection (3) of this section are met, the court shall follow procedures for a periodic review hearing as described in section 19-7-312, as applicable.

When a youth has been adjudicated dependent and neglected pursuant to section 19-3-102, or when there is sufficient evidence that the youth has been subjected to child abuse or neglect, as defined in section 19-1-103 (1), the court shall enter a finding
that the youth is dependent on the court, as defined in section 19-1-103 (54). The court may enter special findings establishing the youth's eligibility for designation as a special immigrant juvenile pursuant to federal law. These
findings may be made at the initial hearing or any time thereafter.

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 421, § 11, effective August 10.

19-7-310. Emancipation discharge hearings - emancipation transition plan.

At the direction of a participating youth, with assistance and support from a county department, an emancipation transition plan that is personalized for the participating youth must be developed and finalized no more than ninety days prior to the participating
youth's emancipation discharge hearing. The emancipation transition plan includes specific options concerning housing, health insurance, education, local opportunities for mentors and continuing support services, and workforce
supports and employment services. The emancipation transition plan must also include information concerning the importance of designating another individual to make health-care treatment decisions on the participating youth's behalf
if the youth becomes unable to participate in such decisions and the participating youth does not have, or does not want, a relative or legal guardian who would otherwise be authorized to make such decisions. The emancipation transition
plan must provide the participating youth with the option to execute a health-care power of attorney and include details at the participating youth's discretion.

If a participating youth remains in the transition program until the participating youth turns twenty-one years of age, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law, at least ninety days prior to the participating youth's
last day of eligibility for the transition program, the county department shall provide the participating youth with:

A clear and developmentally appropriate written notice of the date that the participating youth's voluntary services agreement will terminate;

Repealed.

Information about and contact information for community resources that may benefit the participating youth, specifically including information regarding programs that have been established pursuant to section 19-7-314 or to federal law that provide transitional
foster care assistance to young adults.

Prior to a participating youth's emancipation, the court shall:

Review the participating youth's emancipation transition plan and consult with the participating youth on the participating youth's readiness;

Determine whether the county department has made reasonable efforts toward the participating youth's permanency goals and to prepare the participating youth for a successful transition to adulthood;

Determine whether the participating youth has been provided with all necessary records and documents as described in subsection (4)(b) of this section;

Determine whether the participating youth has been enrolled in medicaid and advise the participating youth on the participating youth's eligibility for former foster care medicaid up to the participating youth's twenty-sixth birthday pursuant to section
25.5-5-101 (1)(e); and

Advise the participating youth that if the youth chooses to emancipate but later decides support is needed, the youth has the right to begin receiving child welfare services again through the foster youth in transition program, created in section 19-7-303,
until the youth's twenty-first birthday, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law; and advise the youth of the necessity of keeping the participating youth's contact information up to date
with the department of health care policy and financing or the appropriate county department.

At least seven days prior to a participating youth's emancipation discharge hearing, the county department shall file a report with the court that includes:

A description of the county department's reasonable efforts toward achieving the participating youth's permanency goals and a successful transition to adulthood;

An affirmation that the county department has provided the participating youth with all necessary records and documents, including copies of all documents listed in section 19-3-702 (4)(d), health records, education records, and written information concerning
the participating youth's family history and contact information for siblings, if appropriate; and

A copy of the participating youth's emancipation transition plan, finalized no more than ninety days prior to the participating youth's emancipation discharge hearing.

With the participating youth's consent, the court may continue the emancipation discharge hearing for up to one hundred nineteen days, but not past the last day of the month in which the participating youth turns twenty-one years of age, or such greater
age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law. The continuance must be to allow time to improve the participating youth's emancipation transition plan, gather necessary documents and records for the participating youth,
or any other reason necessary to allow for the participating youth to have a successful transition to adulthood.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2208, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(2)(b) repealed, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 422, § 12, effective August 10.

19-7-311. Permanency planning hearings - notice to parents.

A permanency planning hearing must be held for a participating youth under the court's jurisdiction pursuant to this part 3 in the same manner as provided in section 19-3-702; except that permanency hearings need only be held at least every twelve months.
The youth's parent or parents are not parties in proceedings pursuant to this article 7 and therefore do not require notice of such hearings.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2210, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
Entire section amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 423, § 13, effective August 10.

19-7-312. Periodic reviews.

The court shall hold a periodic review hearing for each participating youth at least once every six months. A review hearing not coinciding with a permanency hearing may be held on the court's administrative docket by written report upon agreement of
the parties. The review hearing and permanency hearing must be held together in the same hearing when possible.

The primary purpose of the review hearing is to ensure that the transition program is providing the participating youth with the necessary services and supports to help the participating youth move toward permanency and a successful transition to adulthood.

Prior to a periodic review held pursuant to this section, the county department shall file a report with the court that includes:

A copy of the participating youth's roadmap to success;

A statement of the participating youth's progress on the participating youth's goals and whether the participating youth is meeting the participating youth's obligations pursuant to the voluntary services agreement, including any required activities;

A statement of the county department's reasonable efforts to support the participating youth in meeting the participating youth's goals; and

A statement of any barriers to the participating youth in meeting the participating youth's goals and any plans to address such barriers.

The court may order the county department to provide additional services and supports to help the participating youth achieve the goals outlined on the participating youth's roadmap to success or comply with state or federal law.

If the court finds the participating youth is not substantially fulfilling the participating youth's obligations pursuant to the voluntary services agreement, the court may enter orders for the participating youth to follow in order to continue to be
eligible for the transition program.

The court shall conduct a periodic review hearing in a manner that seeks the participating youth's meaningful participation, including offering remote options for participation to accommodate the participating youth's work, school, or treatment commitments.

During the periodic review hearing, the court shall find whether:

The county department made reasonable efforts to implement the participating youth's case plan, including the participating youth's roadmap to success; and

The participating youth continues to need foster care and whether such placement is the least restrictive to meet the participating youth's needs.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2210, § 1, effective June 25.

19-7-313. Continuing jurisdiction.

The court has continuing jurisdiction over the participating youth until any of the following occurs:

The participating youth moves the court, at any time, to withdraw the youth's participation in the transition program and to terminate the court's jurisdiction. The court shall hold an emancipation discharge hearing within thirty-five days after receipt
of the participating youth's motion to review the participating youth's emancipation transition plan and advise the participating youth as provided in section 19-7-310.

A county department moves the court at least ninety days prior to a participating youth's twenty-first birthday, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law, to request an emancipation discharge hearing be held prior to the
last day of the month in which the participating youth turns twenty-one years of age. The court shall hold an emancipation discharge hearing to review the participating youth's emancipation transition plan and advise the
participating youth as provided in section 19-7-310.

A county department moves the court to terminate a participating youth's voluntary services agreement and the court's jurisdiction because the participating youth no longer meets the eligibility requirements described in section 19-7-304 for the transition
program. The county department shall include in the motion its efforts to reengage the participating youth, including:

The provision of written notice to the participating youth in a clear and developmentally appropriate manner that informs the participating youth of the county department's intent to request that the court terminate the participating youth's voluntary
services agreement with an explanation of the reasons; and

Documentation of the county department's reasonable efforts to meet in person with the participating youth to explain the information in the written termination notice and to assist the participating youth in reestablishing eligibility if the participating
youth wishes to continue to participate in the transition program.

The court shall hold the emancipation discharge hearing pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section at least thirty-five days after receipt of the county department's motion to determine whether the participating youth still meets the eligibility requirements
for the transition program, including substantially fulfilling the participating youth's obligations set forth in the participating youth's voluntary services agreement. If the participating youth no longer meets the requirements
of the transition program and the county department has made reasonable but unsuccessful efforts to reengage the participating youth, then the court shall hold an emancipation discharge hearing to review the participating youth's
emancipation transition plan and advise the participating youth as provided in section 19-7-310. The court may accomplish all of these elements in the same emancipation discharge hearing if all of the necessary information has
been filed in a timely fashion.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2211, § 1, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(2) amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 423, § 14, effective August 10.

19-7-314. Foster youth successful transition to adulthood grant program - creation - standards - application - fund - advisory board - duties.

The foster youth successful transition to adulthood grant program is created within the state department. The purpose of the grant program is to create and administer programs that support eligible youth in making a successful transition to adulthood.

The state department shall ensure that services are available to eligible youth throughout Colorado and, in order to do so, administer a merit-based application process to select service providers as follows:

An application from a county department must receive preference over applications from other types of entities; and

An application for a proposed program must receive preference if it includes the provision of evidence-based services.

Youth who meet the following criteria are eligible for services from a program that has received a grant from the grant program:

The youth is eighteen years of age or older but less than twenty-three years of age, or the upper age limit established in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 677 (a), whichever is greater;

The youth was in foster care or adjudicated dependent and neglected on or after the youth's fourteenth birthday; and

The youth voluntarily agrees to participate in the program that is receiving a grant from the grant program.

Scoring methodology for grant program application review.

There is created in the state treasury the Colorado foster youth successful transition to adulthood grant program fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund consists of any money that the general assembly may appropriate to the fund. Money
in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the purpose of providing grants pursuant to this section and for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation
of this section. Any money in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund
must be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year must remain in the fund and available for expenditure by the state department in the next fiscal year without
further appropriation.

The state department shall convene an advisory board, which shall meet at least two times per year, to review the grant program and provide recommendations to the state department including the following items:

(I) Implementation of the grant program;

(II) Funding models and allocation methodologies, including consultation with the advisory board before the state department allocates funding received through the federal "John H. Chafee Foster Care Program for Successful Transition to Adulthood", 42
U.S.C. sec. 677, for the grant program;

(III) Content for grant program applications; and

The executive director shall appoint members of the advisory board for two-year terms. The board must include:

Two directors of county departments of human or social services, or their designees;

Two directors of runaway homeless youth providers, or their designees;

One staff member from the state department with administrative responsibility for programming funded through the federal "John H. Chafee Foster Care Program for Successful Transition to Adulthood", 42 U.S.C. sec. 677;

The managing director of the Colorado workforce development council, or the director's designee;

The executive director of the department of higher education or the director's designee; and

Two youth who have previously participated in the transition program or the federal "John H. Chafee Foster Care Program for Successful Transition to Adulthood", 42 U.S.C. sec. 677.

The advisory board shall have its first meeting on or before October 1, 2022.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2212, § 1, effective June 25.

19-7-315. Rules.

The state department shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this part 3, including but not limited to rules concerning eligibility determinations, administrative appeals of eligibility determinations, enrollment into the transition program,
emancipation transition plans and roadmaps to success, and expedited procedures for securing temporary shelter for youth who are currently homeless or at imminent risk of homelessness.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2214, § 1, effective June 25.